Washington statutes.
RCW 39.33.010

Sale, exchange, transfer, lease of public property authorized—Section deemed alternative.

(1) The state or any municipality or any political subdivision thereof, may sell, transfer, exchange, lease or otherwise dispose of any property, real or personal, or property rights, including but not limited to the title to real property, to the state or any municipality or any political subdivision thereof, or the federal government, or a federally recognized Indian tribe, on such terms and conditions as may be mutually agreed upon by the proper authorities of the state and/or the subdivisions concerned. In addition, the state, or any municipality or any political subdivision thereof, may sell, transfer, exchange, lease, or otherwise dispose of personal property, except weapons, to a foreign entity.

(2) This section shall be deemed to provide an alternative method for the doing of the things authorized herein, and shall not be construed as imposing any additional condition upon the exercise of any other powers vested in the state, municipalities or political subdivisions.

(3) No intergovernmental transfer, lease, or other disposition of property made pursuant to any other provision of law prior to May 23, 1972, shall be construed to be invalid solely because the parties thereto did not comply with the procedures of this section.

[ 2011 c 259 s 1; 2003 c 303 s 1; 1981 c 96 s 1; 1973 c 109 s 1; 1972 ex.s. c 95 s 1; 1953 c 133 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 303: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 14, 2003]." [ 2003 c 303 s 2.]

Exchange of county tax title lands with other governmental agencies: Chapter 36.35 RCW.